Virginia statutes. Title 63.2. Welfare (Social Services).
Article 4.1. Close Relative Adoption.

§ 63.2-1242.1.
Relative adoption.

For the purposes of this chapter, a “close relative placement” shall be an adoption by the child’s grandparent, great-grandparent, adult nephew or niece, adult brother or sister, adult uncle or aunt, adult great uncle or great aunt, stepparent, adult stepbrother or stepsisters, or other adult relatives of the child by marriage or adoption.

In a close relative placement the court may accept the written and signed consent of the birth parent(s) that is signed under oath and acknowledged by an officer authorized by law to take such acknowledgments.

History.

2006, cc. 825, 848; 2019, c. 377.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2006, c. 825, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act that establish the Putative Father Registry shall be enacted July 1, 2007.”

Acts 2006, c. 825, cl. 3, provides: “That the provisions of this act that establish the Putative Father Registry shall not become effective unless an appropriation of general funds effectuating the purposes of this act is included in the general appropriation act passed by the 2006 Session of the General Assembly, which becomes law.”
The funding was provided in the 2006 appropriation act. See Acts 2006, Sp. Sess. I, c. 3.

Effective date.

This article as enacted by Acts 2006, c. 848, became effective July 1, 2006. Acts 2006, c. 825, became effective July 1, 2007.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 377, in subsection A, added “stepparent, adult stepbrother or stepsisters, or other adult relatives of the child by marriage or adoption” at the end; and made stylistic changes.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

14A M.J. Parent and Child, § 11.

§ 63.2-1242.2.
Close relative adoption; child in home less than two years.

When the child has continuously resided in the home or has been in the continuous physical custody of the prospective adoptive parent(s) who is a close relative for less than two years, the adoption proceeding, including court approval of the home study, shall commence in the juvenile and domestic relations district court pursuant to the parental placement adoption provisions of this chapter with the following exceptions:

The birth parent(s)’ consent does not have to be executed in juvenile and domestic relations district court in the presence of the prospective adoptive parents.

The simultaneous meeting specified in §

63.2-1231

is not required.

No hearing is required for this proceeding.

Upon the juvenile and domestic relations district court issuing an order accepting consents or otherwise dealing with birth parents rights and appointing the close relative(s) custodians of the child, the close relative(s) may file a petition in the circuit court as provided in Article 1 (§

63.2-1200

et seq.) of this chapter.

For adoptions under this section:

An order of reference, an investigation and a report shall not be made if the home study report is filed with the circuit court unless the circuit court in its discretion requires an investigation and report to be made.

The circuit court may omit the probationary period and the interlocutory order and enter a final order of adoption when the court is of the opinion that the entry of an order would otherwise be proper.

If the circuit court determines that there is a need for an additional investigation, it shall refer the matter to the licensed child-placing agency that drafted the home study report for an investigation and report, which shall be completed within such times as the circuit court designates.

The circuit court may waive appointment of a guardian ad litem for the child.

History.

2006, cc. 825, 848; 2010, c. 306; 2018, c. 4.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 306 added subdivision C 4.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 4 substituted “two years” for “three years” in subsection A.

§ 63.2-1242.3.
Close relative placement; child in home for two years or more.

When the child has continuously resided in the home or has been in the continuous physical custody of the prospective adoptive parent(s) who is a close relative for two or more years, the parental placement provisions of this chapter shall not apply and the adoption proceeding shall commence in the circuit court.

For adoptions under this section:

An order of reference, an investigation and a report shall not be made unless the circuit court in its discretion shall require an investigation and report to be made.

The circuit court may omit the probationary period and the interlocutory order and enter a final order of adoption when the court is of the opinion that the entry of an order would otherwise be proper.

If the circuit court determines the need for an investigation, it shall refer the matter to the local director of the department of social services for an investigation and report, which shall be completed in such time as the circuit court designates.

The circuit court may waive appointment of a guardian ad litem for the child.

History.

2006, cc. 825, 848; 2010, c. 306; 2018, c. 4.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 306 added subdivision 4.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 4 substituted “two or more years” for “three or more years” in the first paragraph.

Law Review.

For essay, “Virginia Ranks Forty-Ninth of Fifty: The Need for Stronger Laws Supporting Foster Youth,” see 53 U. Rich. L. Rev. 255 (2018).